New Jersey, session 222, S3658.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in this act: "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Health. "Emergency medical technician" means a person trained in basic life support services as defined in section 1 of P.L.1985, c.351 (C.26:2K-21) and who is certified by the Department of Health to provide that level of care. 2.    a.  In addition to an emergency medical technicians authorization to administer epinephrine using a pre-filled epinephrine auto-injector mechanism pursuant to P.L.2003, c.1 (C.26:2K-47.1 et al.), an emergency medical technician shall be permitted to administer epinephrine using a needle and syringe that is not prefilled, as provided in this section. b.    The commissioner shall establish written standards and application procedures which an emergency medical technician shall meet in order to obtain certification to administer epinephrine using a needle and syringe that is not prefilled.  The commissioner shall certify a candidate who: (1) provides evidence of satisfactory completion of an educational program which is approved by the commissioner and includes training in the administration of epinephrine using a needle and syringe that is not prefilled; and (2) passes an examination in the administration of epinephrine using a needle and syringe that is not prefilled, as approved by the commissioner. c.     The commissioner shall maintain a registry of all persons certified pursuant to this section, which shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   the person's name and residence; and (2)   the date on which certification was granted. d.    The commissioner shall annually compile a list of emergency medical technicians who have obtained certification to administer epinephrine using a needle and syringe that is not prefilled pursuant to this section, which shall be available to the public. e.     A fee may be charged to a person enrolled in an educational program approved by the department which includes training in the administration of epinephrine using a needle and syringe that is not prefilled in order to cover the cost of training and testing for certification pursuant to this section, if the entity that provides the educational program is not reimbursed for the cost of that training and testing from the "Emergency Medical Technician Training Fund" established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1992, c.143 (C.26:2K-56). 3.  The Commissioner of Health may adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), if necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.